Utah statutes.
53-7-503.   Rulemaking authority -- Publicly accessible list of contraband
lighters maintained by the state fire marshal -- Authority to seize and
destroy novelty lighters.
(1)  The Utah Fire Prevention Board, created in Section 53-7-203, may adopt
rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, to:
(a)  identify lighters or classes or types of lighters that are novelty
lighters; and
(b)  provide for an informal adjudicative hearing, as provided in Section
63G-4-203, by the board to hear appeals of decisions of the State Fire Marshal
Division under this part.
(2) (a)  The state fire marshal shall establish and maintain a list of
lighters, or classes and types of lighters, that the state fire marshal has
determined to be novelty lighters under this part.
(b)  The state fire marshal shall make the list available on the website
maintained by the Department of Public Safety.
(3)  A lighter is a contraband item subject to seizure and destruction by the
state fire marshal, a representative of the state fire marshal, a local fire
enforcement official, or by a law enforcement agency, if the lighter is:
(a)  listed, or of a class or type listed, by the state fire marshal as a
novelty lighter; and
(b)  offered for sale, sold, or distributed in this state.
(4) (a)  The state fire marshal, a representative of the state fire marshal, a
local fire enforcement official, or a law enforcement agency may seize a
novelty lighter that is not described in Subsection (3).
(b)  Upon finding that the person from whom the novelty lighter was seized is
subject to a civil penalty under Section 53-7-504 for being an importer,
wholesaler, seller, or distributor of the novelty lighter, the state fire
marshal or a representative may order that the novelty lighter be forfeited
and destroyed.
